Maryland, session 2026, HB1037.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(2) (i) “Broadband service” means a mass–market retail service that
provides the capability to transmit data to and receive data from all or substantially all
Internet endpoints, including any capabilities that are incidental to and enable the
operation of communications services provided by an Internet service provider.
(ii) “Broadband service” does not include dial–up Internet service.
(3) “Internet service provider” means an entity that provides broadband
service to a customer in the State through any of the following modes:
(i) wireline;
(ii) fixed wireless;
(iii) mobile wireless; or
(iv) satellite.
(4) (i) “Voice over Internet protocol service” or “VoIP service” means
any service that:
1. enables real–time two–way voice communications that
originate from or terminate to the subscriber end user’s location requiring Internet protocol
or any successor protocol to Internet protocol; and
2. requires a broadband connection from the user’s location.
(ii) “Voice over Internet protocol service” or “VoIP service” includes
any service that allows users generally to receive calls that originate on the public switched
telephone network and to terminate calls to the public switched telephone network.
(b) The Public Service Commission shall conduct a study and make
recommendations regarding the potential scope, structure, and implementation of
Commission oversight of broadband service and VoIP service in the State, including
considering:

HOUSE BILL 1037 3
(1) the extent to which federal jurisdiction preempts State regulation of
broadband service and VoIP service;
(2) an appropriate regulatory framework to implement oversight of
broadband service and VoIP service that encompasses:
(i) standards for Internet service provider resiliency and reliability,
including the requirement to submit outage data;
(ii) standards for Internet service provider emergency preparedness;
(iii) public disclosure reporting requirements for the availability,
deployment, pricing, and adoption of broadband services and VoIP services;
(iv) a customer complaint process at the Commission; and
(v) a publicly accessible resource that contains information on
broadband services, including prices;
(3) the applicability of the current regulatory framework for landline
telecommunications to the regulation of broadband services and VoIP services;
(4) the expected cost to the Commission to implement the appropriate
regulatory framework and obtain the resources necessary to regulate broadband services
and VoIP services;
(5) statutory mechanisms and regulatory mechanisms utilized in other
states to oversee broadband services and VoIP services; and
(6) any legislative changes that must be enacted to establish the
Commission’s oversight authority.
(c) On or before December 31, 2026, the Public Service Commission shall report,
in accordance with § 2–1257 of the State Government Article, its findings and
recommendations to the Senate Committee on Education, Energy, and the Environment,
the House Environment and Transportation Committee, and the General Assembly.
Article – Public Utilities
5–107.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) (I) “BROADBAND SERVICE” MEANS A MASS–MARKET RETAIL
SERVICE THAT PROVIDES THE CAPABILITY TO TRANSMIT DATA TO AND RECEIVE

HOUSE BILL 1037
DATA FROM ALL OR SUBSTANTIALLY ALL INTERNET ENDPOINTS, INCLUDING ANY
CAPABILITIES THAT ARE INCIDENTAL TO AND ENABLE THE OPERATION OF
COMMUNICATIONS SERVICES PROVIDED BY A WIRELINE, FIXED WIRELESS, MOBILE
WIRELESS BROADBAND, OR SATELLITE SERVICE PROVIDER.
(II) “BROADBAND SERVICE” DOES NOT INCLUDE DIAL–UP
INTERNET SERVICE.
(3) “INTERNET SERVICE PROVIDER” MEANS AN ENTITY THAT
PROVIDES BROADBAND SERVICE TO A CUSTOMER IN THE STATE.
(4) (I) “VOICE OVER INTERNET PROTOCOL SERVICE” OR “VOIP
SERVICE” MEANS ANY SERVICE THAT:
1. ENABLES REAL–TIME TWO–WAY VOICE
COMMUNICATIONS THAT ORIGINATE FROM OR TERMINATE TO THE SUBSCRIBER END
USER’S LOCATION REQUIRING INTERNET PROTOCOL OR ANY SUCCESSOR PROTOCOL
TO INTERNET PROTOCOL; AND
2. REQUIRES A BROADBAND CONNECTION FROM THE
USER’S LOCATION.
(II) “VOICE OVER INTERNET PROTOCOL SERVICE” OR “VOIP
SERVICE” INCLUDES ANY SERVICE THAT ALLOWS USERS GENERALLY TO RECEIVE
CALLS THAT ORIGINATE ON THE PUBLIC SWITCHED TELEPHONE NETWORK AND TO
TERMINATE CALLS TO THE PUBLIC SWITCHED TELEPHONE NETWORK.
(B) THE COMMISSION MAY EXERCISE OVERSIGHT OF BROADBAND SERVICE
AND VOIP SERVICE.
(C) THE COMMISSION SHALL ADOPT REGULATIONS TO IMPLEMENT
EFFECTIVE OVERSIGHT OF THE QUALITY, RELIABILITY, AND RESILIENCE OF
BROADBAND SERVICE AND VOIP SERVICE, INCLUDING:
(1) ESTABLISHING STANDARDS TO ENSURE THE RESILIENCE AND
RELIABILITY OF BROADBAND INFRASTRUCTURE;
(2) REQUIRING EACH INTERNET SERVICE PROVIDER TO:
(I) SUBMIT INFORMATION RELATING TO NETWORK
RELIABILITY, INCLUDING REPORTING OUTAGES;

HOUSE BILL 1037 5
(II) MAINTAIN NETWORKS SUFFICIENTLY IN ORDER TO ENSURE
RELIABLE, SAFE, AND ADEQUATE SERVICES;
(III) REPORT DATA ON THE AVAILABILITY, DEPLOYMENT,
PRICING, AND ADOPTION OF BROADBAND SERVICES AND VOIP SERVICES; AND
(IV) SUBMIT TO THE COMMISSION THE PROVIDER’S PLANS FOR
EMERGENCY PREPAREDNESS AND POSTEMERGENCY NETWORK RESTORATION;
(3) ESTABLISHING A SYSTEM FOR ASSESSING THE ADEQUACY OF
INTERNET SERVICE PROVIDERS’ PLANS FOR EMERGENCY PREPAREDNESS AND
POSTEMERGENCY NETWORK RESTORATION; AND
(4) ESTABLISHING MINIMUM REQUIREMENTS FOR BACKUP POWER
GENERATION.
(D) THE COMMISSION SHALL ASSESS THE ADEQUACY OF EACH INTERNET
SERVICE PROVIDER’S PLAN FOR EMERGENCY PREPAREDNESS AND
POSTEMERGENCY NETWORK RESTORATION IN ACCORDANCE WITH REGULATIONS
ADOPTED UNDER THIS SECTION.
(E) (1) ON RECEIPT OF A COMPLAINT FROM A CUSTOMER OR BASED ON
DATA COLLECTED FROM PROVIDERS, THE COMMISSION MAY CONDUCT AN
EVALUATION OR AUDIT OF AN INTERNET SERVICE PROVIDER’S FACILITIES AND
INFRASTRUCTURE TO ASSESS SERVICE QUALITY, PUBLIC SAFETY CONCERNS, OR
NETWORK RESILIENCE.
(2) THE COMMISSION MAY HOLD A HEARING AS PART OF THE
EVALUATION OR AUDIT AUTHORIZED UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION.
(3) IF THE COMMISSION DETERMINES THAT THE PRACTICES,
FACILITIES, OR SERVICES OF AN INTERNET SERVICE PROVIDER ARE UNJUST,
UNREASONABLE, UNSAFE, IMPROPER, OR INADEQUATE TO ENSURE NETWORK
RELIABILITY, RESILIENCE, AND PUBLIC SAFETY IN ACCORDANCE WITH THE
STANDARDS ESTABLISHED UNDER SUBSECTION (C) OF THIS SECTION, THE
COMMISSION MAY REQUIRE THE PROVIDER TO UNDERTAKE REMEDIAL ACTIONS.
(F) ON OR BEFORE JANUARY 1, 2028, AND EACH JANUARY 1 THEREAFTER,
THE COMMISSION SHALL REPORT TO THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY, IN ACCORDANCE
WITH § 2–1257 OF THE STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE, ON PROGRESS MADE
TOWARD IMPROVING SERVICE QUALITY, PUBLIC SAFETY, AND NETWORK
RESILIENCE.

HOUSE BILL 1037
(G) (1) NOTHING IN THIS SECTION MAY BE CONSTRUED TO LIMIT ANY
RIGHT OR AUTHORITY GRANTED TO THE OFFICE OF STATEWIDE BROADBAND
UNDER TITLE 6.5 OF THE HOUSING AND COMMUNITY DEVELOPMENT ARTICLE.
(2) THE COMMISSION MAY COORDINATE WITH THE OFFICE OF
STATEWIDE BROADBAND WHEN COLLECTING DATA TO CARRY OUT THE PROVISIONS
OF THIS SECTION.
[Subtitle 6. Voice over Internet Protocol Service.]
[8–601.
In this subtitle:
(1) “voice over Internet protocol service” or “VoIP service” means any
service that:
(i) enables real–time two–way voice communications that originate
from or terminate to the subscriber end user’s location requiring Internet protocol or any
successor protocol to Internet protocol; and
(ii) requires a broadband connection from the user’s location; and
(2) “voice over Internet protocol service” or “VoIP service” includes any
such service that permits users generally to receive calls that originate on the public
switched telephone network and to terminate calls to the public switched telephone
network.]
[8–602.
(a) The Commission does not have jurisdiction over the regulation of VoIP service,
including the imposition of regulatory fees, certification requirements, and the filing or
approval of tariffs.
(b) Nothing in this subtitle may be construed to:
(1) require or prohibit the assessment of 9–1–1 fees in accordance with §
1–310 of the Public Safety Article on VoIP;
(2) require or prohibit the assessment of fees for telecommunications relay
service under Title 3, Subtitle 8 of the State Finance and Procurement Article;
(3) require or prohibit the payment of any switched network access rates
or other intercarrier compensation rates that may be determined to apply;

HOUSE BILL 1037 7
(4) relieve a company that is otherwise subject to § 8–201 of this title of its
obligation to provide telephone lifeline service over local exchange access lines that are
subject to the Commission’s jurisdiction;
(5) exempt VoIP service from generally applicable State and federal laws
relating to public safety, consumer protection, and unfair and deceptive trade practices, or
to exempt VoIP service from the authority of the Division of Consumer Protection in the
Office of the Attorney General; or
(6) remove the Commission’s jurisdiction over circuit switched local
exchange access service.
(c) A company that moves a customer from a Commission–approved tariff service
to VoIP service shall notify the customer that the Commission does not have jurisdiction
over the regulation of VoIP service and that complaints about VoIP service may be filed
with the Division of Consumer Protection in the Office of the Attorney General.]
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October July 1, 2026.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.